California statutes. Business and Professions Code
No motor vehicle fuel producer or distributor shall compel or unduly or unreasonably influence any retail dealer to participate in the giveaway or offer to give away free of charge any item of value, including trading stamps or any kind of merchandise or goods, whether or not the giveaway is conditional upon the purchase of motor vehicle fuels or lubricants. The decision to participate in those giveaways shall be solely that of the retail dealer. Nothing in this section shall prohibit a retail dealer from entering into an agreement to participate in any giveaway program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 591, Sec. 44.   (AB 808)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 14. Passing Off [13561. - 13571.]

13561.

This article does not prohibit any person from selling under his or her own trademarks, trade names, brands, or the words “no brand,” the product of any manufacturer if such person has first obtained the written authorization of the true manufacturer so to sell such product.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 636, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

13562.

No person other than the true manufacturer who purchases any petroleum product shall change the designation under which the product is purchased by him or her, without a written authorization.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 636, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

13568.

Copies of the written authorizations required by this article shall be furnished the department upon request.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 636, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

13570.

(a) A manufacturer, blender, agent, jobber, consignment agent, or distributor who distributes motor vehicle fuel that contains at least 1 percent alcohol by volume, shall state on an invoice, bill of lading, shipping paper, or other documentation used in normal and customary business practices, the percentage of alcohol, the type of alcohol, and, except in documentation certifying the octane rating of gasoline as required by federal law, the minimum antiknock index number, as defined in subdivision (q) of Section 13400, of the products distributed.

(b) If a motor vehicle fuel product contains less than 10 percent ethanol, a statement in the documentation that the product “contains up to 10% ethanol” meets the requirement of
 subdivision (a) that it state the percentage of ethanol.

(c) This section, as it relates to certification of the minimum antiknock index number, applies to all motor vehicle gasoline distributed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 208, Sec. 2.   (AB 2906)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

13571.

Copies of the documentation specified in Section 13570 shall be available for inspection during business hours by duly authorized representatives of the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1012, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 16. Enforcement [13590. - 13600.]

13590.

It is the duty of the department acting through the Division of Measurement Standards to enforce the provisions of this chapter, and to appoint and employ inspectors as may be necessary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 591, Sec. 46.   (AB 808)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

13591.

(a) The department, its inspectors, and each sealer, are hereby authorized and empowered to inspect the motor vehicle fuels or lubricants referred to in this chapter and to enter, for the purpose of the inspection, any place where motor vehicle fuels or lubricants are kept or stored for sale.

(b) All those officers shall enforce the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 591, Sec. 47.   (AB 808)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

13592.

The department, each sealer, and any person now or hereafter authorized or empowered by law to inspect the motor vehicle fuels or lubricants referred to in this chapter, may take such sample or samples as may be necessary of any motor vehicle fuel or lubricant kept or stored for the purpose of sale.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 591, Sec. 48.   (AB 808)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

13593.

It is unlawful for any person, or any member, officer, agent, or employee of a firm, association, or corporation, to refuse to permit any person authorized by this article to take such sample or samples permitted by this chapter, or to prevent or to attempt to prevent the taking of such sample or samples.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 636, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

13594.

If the owner or person in possession of the product of which a sample is taken under this article shall at the time of the taking, demand payment for the commodity taken, then the person taking the sample shall pay therefor the reasonable market price.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 636, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

13595.

(a) It is unlawful for any person to sell or deliver any motor vehicle fuel or lubricant referred to in this chapter that fails to meet the specifications required by this chapter.

(b) It is unlawful for any person to sell or deliver any motor vehicle fuel or lubricant referred to in this chapter into, from, or through an unlabeled or mislabeled container or device.

(c) (1) The department, each county sealer, deputy county sealer, and inspector may close and seal outlets and inlets of any receptacles, containers, pumps, dispensers, or storage tanks connected to the outlets and inlets, containing
 any motor vehicle fuel or lubricant referred to in this chapter that fails to meet the requirements of this chapter.

(2) The person so sealing shall post in a conspicuous place on the premises, where a receptacle, container, pump, dispenser, or storage tank connected to the outlets and inlets has been sealed, a notice stating that the action of sealing has been taken in accordance with this chapter, and giving warning that it is unlawful to break, mutilate, or destroy the seal or seals of the outlets and inlets, to move the container, or to remove the contents from the container, under the penalty provided in this division.

(d) If a container or lot of containers of any commodity subject to this chapter is found to contain a commodity not in conformity with this chapter, the secretary or sealer representing the secretary may take a sample or samples reasonably necessary for
 enforcement purposes and may, in writing, order the containers off sale. Any lot or container ordered off sale pursuant to this section shall be subject to a disposal order by the enforcing officer and shall not be sold, offered for sale, or transported, except in accordance with that disposal order. Any action pursuant to this section shall not affect any rights of a retailer under a warranty of merchantability or warranty of fitness.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 591, Sec. 49.   (AB 808)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

13596.

Upon at least 24 hours’ written notice from the owner, manager, or operator of the container, receptacle, pump, or storage tank which has been sealed, to the department or to the sealer of the county in which the premises are situated stating that the contents of such container, receptacle, pump, or storage tank will be removed or that such container, receptacle, pump, or storage tank or inlet end of the fill-pipe thereof will be properly labeled as provided in this chapter, at a specified time, between the hours of 9 a.m. and 4 p.m. of a day specified in the notice, other than a holiday, such officer shall, at the time specified, break the seal or seals for the purpose of permitting the removal by such manager, owner, or operator, of the contents of such container, receptacle, pump, or storage tank connected thereto, or the use thereof after proper labeling.

The removal of contents or proper labeling of the container, receptacle, pump, storage tank, or inlet end of the fill-pipe thereof, as the case may be, shall be made at the time specified and in the presence of the officer removing the seal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 636, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

13597.

If for any reason at the time specified in the written notice the contents are not removed, or the container, receptacle, pump, storage tank, or inlet end of the fill-pipe thereof is not properly labeled, then the container, receptacle, pump, or storage tank connected thereto and the inlet end of the fill-pipe of such storage tank shall be again sealed as provided in this article and the contents may not thereafter be removed or the container, receptacle, pump, or storage tank connected thereto, or inlet end of the fill-pipe thereof, be again used, except upon the giving of a new notice and proper labeling.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 636, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

13598.

Upon removal of the contents or proper labeling as provided in this article, the notice previously posted shall be removed and the container, receptacle, pump, or storage tank may be restored to lawful use.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 636, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

13599.

No container, receptacle, pump, or storage tank connected thereto, or the inlet end of the fill-pipe of such storage tank, shall, however, be relabeled by the owner, manager, or operator, whether under the provisions of this article or otherwise, without first removing from such container, receptacle, pump, or storage tank connected thereto, or the inlet end of the fill-pipe thereof, all distinctive colors, brands, trademarks, or trade names thereon of any manufacturer, refiner, producer, distributor, or marketer, indicative of any product not actually contained therein and sold therefrom.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 636, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

13600.

It is unlawful for any person, or any member, officer, agent, or employee of a firm, association, or corporation, other than the department or any of the officers mentioned in this article, to break, mutilate, or destroy any seal or seals placed upon a container, receptacle, pump, or storage tank connected thereto, or any other storage tank containing a motor vehicle fuel or lubricant, when placed thereon as provided by this article, or to move a container so sealed, or remove the contents therefrom, or to cover, deface, or remove the notice of sealing required by this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 591, Sec. 50.   (AB 808)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 17. Penalties [13610. - 13611.]

13610.

Each person is guilty of a separate offense for each day during any portion of which any violation of this chapter is committed, continued, or permitted by the person, and the person shall be punishable therefor as provided in this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 590, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

13611.

The department or any sealer may bring an action to enjoin the violation or the threatened violation of any provision of this chapter or of any regulation made pertaining to the provisions of this chapter. The action may be brought in the county in which such violation occurs or is about to occur. There may be enjoined in one proceeding any number of defendants alleged to be violating the same provisions or regulations, although their properties, interests, residences, or places of business may be in several counties and the violations separate and distinct. Any proceeding brought pursuant to this section shall be governed in all other respects by the provisions of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525) of Title 7 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 636, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 18. Disposition and Use of Moneys [13620. - 13620.]

13620.

Any moneys in the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund derived under Chapters 14 (commencing with Section 13400) and 15 (commencing with Section 13700) may be expended for the administration and enforcement of any or all of the provisions of those chapters, notwithstanding any other provision of law limiting the expenditure of any of those moneys to the specific purposes or to the administration or enforcement of each of the chapters separately.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 698, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 14.5. Service Stations [13650. - 13660.]

13650.

“Service station,” as used in this chapter, means any establishment which offers for sale or sells gasoline or other motor vehicle fuel to the public.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1561, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

13651.

(a) (1) On and after January 1, 2000, every service station in this state shall provide, during operating hours, and make available at no cost to customers who purchase motor vehicle fuel, water, compressed air, and a gauge for measuring air pressure, to the public for use in servicing any passenger vehicle, as defined in Section 465 of the Vehicle Code, or any commercial vehicle, as defined in Section 260 of the Vehicle Code, with an unladen weight of 6,000 pounds or less.

(2) Every service station in this state shall display, at a conspicuous place on, at, or near the dispensing apparatus, at least one clearly visible sign which shall read as follows: “CALIFORNIA LAW REQUIRES THIS STATION TO PROVIDE FREE AIR AND WATER FOR AUTOMOTIVE PURPOSES TO ITS CUSTOMERS WHO PURCHASE MOTOR VEHICLE FUEL. IF YOU HAVE A COMPLAINT NOTIFY THE STATION ATTENDANT AND/OR CALL THIS TOLL-FREE TELEPHONE NUMBER: 1 (800) ___ ____.” This sign shall meet the requirements of Sections 13473 and 13474 with regard to letter size and contrast. As used in this paragraph, automotive purposes does not include the washing of vehicles.

(b) (1) On and after January 1, 1990, every service station in this state located within 660 feet of an accessible right-of-way of an interstate or primary highway, as defined in Sections 5215 and 5220, shall provide, during business hours public restrooms for use by its customers. Service stations shall not charge customers separately for the use of restroom facilities.

(2) The public restroom shall not be temporary or portable but shall be permanent and shall include separate facilities for men and women, each with toilets and sinks suitable for use by disabled persons in accordance with Section 19955.5 of the Health and Safety Code and Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations. However, a service station not located along an interstate highway and in a rural area, as defined by Section 101 of Title 23 of the United States Code, and where the annualized average daily traffic count is 2,500 vehicles or less, is only required to provide a single restroom to be used by both men and women unless the local legislative body or, upon designation by the local legislative body, the local building official determines and finds, based upon traffic studies and local or seasonal tourist patterns, that a single restroom would be inadequate to serve the public. In that event, the single restroom exemption shall not apply. The single restroom shall contain a toilet, urinal, and sink suitable for use by disabled persons as required by the Americans With Disabilities Act and Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations. The single restroom shall be equipped with a locking mechanism to be operated by the user of the restroom and the restroom shall be maintained in a clean and sanitary manner.

(3) This subdivision does not apply to service stations that are operational prior to January 1, 1990, and that would be obligated to construct permanent restroom facilities to comply with this subdivision.

(4) For the purposes of this subdivision, “customer” means a person who purchases any product available for sale on the premises of the service station, including items not related to the repairing or servicing of a motor vehicle.

(c) Every service station in this state shall display, at a conspicuous place on, at, or near the dispensing apparatus or at or near the point of sale, at least one clearly visible sign showing a list of applicable state and federal fuel taxes per gallon of motor vehicle fuel sold from the dispensing apparatus. The sign may display the federal excise tax rate as “up to $.184.”

(d) (1) The Division of Measurement Standards of the Department of Food and Agriculture shall, no later than January 1, 2001, establish a toll-free customer complaint telephone number. The toll-free telephone number thereby established shall be printed on the sign required pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).

(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, employees of the Division of Measurement Standards, upon inspection, or upon notice of a complaint forwarded pursuant to this section, are empowered to investigate a complaint against a service station for lack of free air and water and issue a citation to the station, and to collect a fine of two hundred fifty dollars ($250) per valid complaint, unless the citation is challenged in court. No citation shall be issued if the air and water equipment is in good working order upon initial inspection, or if they are repaired to the satisfaction of the inspecting entity within 10 working days of the initial inspection. In addition, no citation based on nonfunctional air and water equipment shall be issued if the service station can establish that the equipment has been the target of repeated vandalism, substantiated by three or more police reports within six months detailing the vandalism.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 63, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

13652.

(a) Any person who intentionally violates any provision of this chapter or any regulation promulgated pursuant thereto is guilty of an infraction, and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine not to exceed fifty dollars ($50) for each day that the person violates the provision or regulation.

(b) The failure of an owner or manager of a service station to have adequate water and air facilities available for use by the public, or to provide permanent public restrooms for use by its customers, as required by subdivision (b) of Section 13651, for five consecutive working days, constitutes a rebuttable presumption affecting the burden of proof that the owner or manager has intentionally violated this chapter. This subdivision does not apply to restrooms rendered inoperable as a result of vandalism or plumbing problems that may not be readily repaired.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, no person shall be guilty of the infraction specified in subdivision (a) if that person, within seven days after receiving notification from the city attorney, district attorney, or Attorney General of any violation of this chapter, makes whatever changes are necessary to comply with the requirements of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 491, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

13653.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, this chapter may be enforced by the city attorney, district attorney, or Attorney General.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1561, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

13660.

(a) Every person, firm, partnership, association, trustee, or corporation that operates a service station shall provide, upon request, refueling service to a disabled driver of a vehicle that displays a disabled person’s plate or placard, or a disabled veteran’s plate, issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles. The price charged for the motor vehicle fuel shall be no greater than that which the station otherwise would charge the public generally to purchase motor vehicle fuel without refueling service.

(b) Any person or entity specified in subdivision (a) that operates a service station shall be exempt from this section during hours when:

(1) Only one employee is on duty.

(2) Only two employees are on duty, one of whom is assigned exclusively to the preparation of food.

As used in this subdivision, the term “employee” does not include a person employed by an unrelated business that is not owned or operated by the entity offering motor vehicle fuel for sale to the general public.

(c) (1) Every person, firm, partnership, association, trustee, or corporation required to provide refueling service for persons with disabilities pursuant to this section shall post the following notice, or a notice with substantially similar language, in a manner and single location that is conspicuous to a driver seeking refueling service:

“Service to Disabled Persons

Disabled individuals properly displaying a disabled person’s plate or placard, or a disabled veteran’s plate, issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles, are entitled to request and receive refueling service at this service station for which they may not be charged more than the self-service price.” 

(2) If refueling service is limited to certain hours pursuant to an exemption set forth in subdivision (b), the notice required by paragraph (1) shall also specify the hours during which refueling service for persons with disabilities is available.

(3) Every person, firm, partnership, association, trustee, or corporation that, consistent with subdivision (b), does not provide refueling service for persons with disabilities during any hours of operation shall post the following notice in a manner and single location that is conspicuous to a driver seeking refueling service:

“No Service for Disabled Persons

This service station does not provide refueling service for disabled individuals.”

(4) The signs required by paragraphs (1) and (3) shall also include a statement indicating that drivers seeking information about enforcement of laws related to refueling services for persons with disabilities may call one or more toll-free telephone numbers specified and maintained by the Department of Rehabilitation. By January 31, 1999, the Director of the Department of Rehabilitation shall notify the State Board of Equalization of the toll-free telephone number or numbers to be included on the signs required by this subdivision. At least one of these toll-free telephone numbers shall be accessible to persons using telephone devices for the deaf. The State Board of Equalization shall publish information regarding the toll-free telephone numbers as part of its annual notification required by subdivision (i). In the event that the toll-free telephone number or numbers change, the Director of the Department of Rehabilitation shall notify the State Board of Equalization of the new toll-free telephone number or numbers to be used.

(d) During the county sealer’s normal petroleum product inspection of a service station, the sealer shall verify that a sign has been posted in accordance with subdivision (c). If a sign has not been posted, the sealer shall issue a notice of violation to the owner or agent. The sealer shall be reimbursed, as prescribed by the department, from funds provided under Chapter 14. If substantial, repeated violations of subdivision (c) are noted at the same service station, the sealer shall refer the matter to the appropriate local law enforcement agency.

(e) The local law enforcement agency shall, upon the verified complaint of any person or public agency, investigate the actions of any person, firm, partnership, association, trustee, or corporation alleged to have violated this section. If the local law enforcement agency determines that there has been a denial of service in violation of this section, or a substantial or repeated failure to comply with subdivision (c), the agency shall levy the fine prescribed in subdivision (f).

(f) Any person who, as a responsible managing individual setting service policy of a service station, or as an employee acting independently against the set service policy, acts in violation of this section is guilty of an infraction punishable by a fine of one hundred dollars ($100) for the first offense, two hundred dollars ($200) for the second offense, and five hundred dollars ($500) for each subsequent offense.

(g) In addition to those matters referred pursuant to subdivision (e), the city attorney, the district attorney, or the Attorney General, upon his or her own motion, may investigate and prosecute alleged violations of this section. Any person or public agency may also file a verified complaint alleging violation of this section with the city attorney, district attorney, or Attorney General.

(h) Enforcement of this section may be initiated by any intended beneficiary of the provisions of this section, his or her representatives, or any public agency that exercises oversight over the service station, and the action shall be governed by Section 1021.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(i) An annual notice setting forth the provisions of this section shall be provided by the State Board of Equalization to every person, firm, partnership, association, trustee, or corporation that operates a service station.

(j) A notice setting forth the provisions of this section shall be printed on each disabled person’s placard issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles on and after January 1, 1999. A notice setting forth the provisions of this section shall be provided to each person issued a disabled person’s or disabled veteran’s plate on and after January 1, 1998.

(k) For the purposes of this action “refueling service” means the service of pumping motor vehicle fuel into the fuel tank of a motor vehicle.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 879, Sec. 26.4.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 15. Automotive Products [13700. - 13741.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [13700. - 13702.]

13700.

For purposes of this chapter, the following terms mean the following:

(a) “Automotive product” means engine coolant or antifreeze, prediluted engine coolant or prediluted antifreeze, brake fluid, transmission fluid, and diesel exhaust fluid.

(b) “Transmission fluid” means a product intended for use in a motor vehicle as either a lubricant, coolant, or liquid medium in any type of transmission, or any other type of unit through which, or by which, force, energy, or power is transferred from a motor vehicle engine by hydraulic means to the driving assembly. Transmission fluid does not include manual transmission lubricant, as described in the
 latest revision of the SAE Information Report on axle and manual transmission lubricants, SAE International J308.

(c) “Brake fluid” means the fluid intended for use as the liquid medium through which force is transmitted in the hydraulic brake system of a vehicle operated upon the highways.

(d) “Carton” means the package or wrapping in which a number of containers are shipped or stored.

(e) “Container” means any receptacle in which a commodity is immediately contained when sold, but does not mean a carton or wrapping in which a number of receptacles are shipped or stored, or a tank car or truck.

(f) “Diesel exhaust fluid” or “DEF” means an aqueous urea solution used in selective catalytic reduction to lower oxides of nitrogen concentration in the
 exhaust emissions of diesel engines that meets the last version of International Organization for Standardization (ISO) specification for DEF.

(g) “Engine coolant” or “antifreeze” means any substance or preparation, regardless of its origin, intended to be diluted before use as the cooling medium in the cooling system of an internal combustion engine to provide protection against freezing, overheating, and corrosion of the cooling system, or any product intended to be diluted before use that is labeled to indicate or imply that it will prevent freezing or overheating of the cooling system of an internal combustion engine.

(h) “Label” means all written, printed, or graphic representations, in any form whatsoever, imprinted upon or affixed to any container referred to in this chapter.

(i) “Prediluted engine coolant” or
 “prediluted antifreeze” means any substance or preparation, regardless of its origin, intended or labeled for use at full strength as the cooling medium or as a top off in the cooling system of an internal combustion engine to provide or supplement protection against freezing, overheating, or corrosion of the cooling system.

(j) “Principal display panel” means that part of the label that is designed to most likely be displayed, presented, shown, or examined under normal and customary conditions of display and purchase.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 591, Sec. 51.   (AB 808)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

13701.

Any material offered for sale or sold as an additive to automatic transmission fluids shall be compatible with the automatic transmission fluid to which it is added, and the resulting mixture shall not fall below the minimum specifications for automatic transmission fluids, as established by the department.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 13707 by Stats. 1992, Ch. 322, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

13702.

Any words and letters required to be displayed on a container by this chapter shall be in legible type.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 13708 by Stats. 1992, Ch. 322, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Specifications and Labeling [13710. - 13713.]

13710.

(a) (1) The department shall establish specifications for engine coolants, antifreeze, prediluted engine coolants, and prediluted antifreeze that promote the public safety in the operation of motor vehicles.

(2) The chemical, physical, and performance specifications for engine coolants and antifreeze and prediluted engine coolants and prediluted antifreeze under paragraph (1) shall not fall below the minimum specifications, if any, established by ASTM International. Engine coolant and antifreeze shall not contain, after dilution with 30 percent water and subsequent mixing, visually identifiable suspended matter or sediment. Prediluted engine coolant and prediluted antifreeze shall not contain, after
 mixing, visually identifiable suspended matter or sediment.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, the department shall adopt the ASTM International testing procedures. Methanol- and ethanol-based coolants and antifreeze are not suitable for use in automotive engines and shall not be sold or distributed for automotive use.

(b) Transmission fluid shall meet the latest automotive manufacturers’ recommended requirements for all transmissions disclosed on the label of its container. No transmission fluid shall be sold without clearly disclosing, on the label of its container, the type of transmission for which it is intended.

(c) The department shall establish specifications for brake fluid that promote the public safety in the operation of automotive vehicles. The specifications for brake fluid shall not fall below the
 minimum specifications established by the National Highway Traffic Safety Administration of the United States Department of Transportation.

(d) Any manufacturer or packager of any product regulated by this chapter and sold in the state shall provide, upon request to duly authorized representatives of the department, documentation of any claim made upon their products’ label.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 591, Sec. 52.   (AB 808)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

13711.

(a) An engine coolant or antifreeze is mislabeled if any of the following occurs:

(1) The container does not bear a label on which is printed the brand name, principal ingredient, intended application of the coolant or antifreeze, name and place of business of the manufacturer, packer, seller, or distributor, and an accurate statement of the quantity of the contents in terms of liquid measure.

(2) The container does not bear a chart on the label showing appropriate amounts of engine coolant or antifreeze and water in terms of liquid measure to be used to provide protection from freezing at temperatures to at least 30 degrees
 below zero Fahrenheit.

(3) The container does not bear a statement on the label showing the boiling point of a 50 percent by volume mixture of engine coolant or antifreeze and water in degrees Fahrenheit.

(4) The container is one quart or less and does not bear a label on which is printed the words “engine coolant” or “antifreeze” in letters at least 18 inch high on the principal display panel. The container is greater than one quart and does not bear a label on which is printed the words “engine coolant” or “antifreeze” in letters at least 14 inch high on the principal display panel.

(5) The principal ingredient is propylene glycol or glycerin and the container does not bear a statement on the label not to use an ethylene glycol hydrometer concentration tester for propylene glycol or glycerin coolants.

(6) The container and carton do not bear a lot or batch number on the label identifying the container lot and date of packaging.

(b) A prediluted engine coolant or prediluted antifreeze is mislabeled if any of the following occurs:

(1) The container does not bear a label on which is printed the brand name, principal ingredient, intended application of the coolant or antifreeze, name and place of business of the manufacturer, packer, seller, or
 distributor, and an accurate statement of the quantity of the contents in terms of liquid measure.

(2) The container does not bear a statement on the label showing the protection from freezing in degrees Fahrenheit.

(3) The container does not bear a statement on the label showing the boiling point in degrees Fahrenheit.

(4) The container is one quart or less and does not bear a label on which is printed the words “prediluted engine coolant” or “prediluted antifreeze” in letters at least 18 inch high on the principal display panel. The container is greater than one quart and does not bear a label on which is printed the words “prediluted engine
 coolant” or “prediluted antifreeze” in letters at least 14 inch high on the principal display panel.

(5) The container is one quart or less and does not bear a label on which is printed the words “DO NOT ADD WATER” in letters at least18 inch high. The container is greater than one quart and does not bear a label on which is printed the words “DO NOT ADD WATER” in letters at least 14 inch high.

(6) The principal ingredient is propylene glycol or glycerin and the container does not bear a statement on the label not to use
 an ethylene glycol hydrometer concentration tester for propylene glycol or glycerin coolants.

(7) The container and carton do not bear a lot or batch number on the label identifying the container lot and date of packaging.

(c) “Transmission fluid” is mislabeled if any of the following occurs:

(1) The container does not bear a label on which is printed the brand name, the name and place of business of the manufacturer, packer, seller, or distributor, the words “Transmission Fluid,” and the duty type classification.

(2) The container does not bear a label on which is printed an accurate statement of the quantity of the contents in terms of liquid measure.

(3) The labeling on the container is false or misleading.

(4) The container and carton do not bear information that identifies the container lot or batch.

(d) Brake fluid is mislabeled if any of the following occurs:

(1) The container does not bear a label that conforms to the requirements of the National Highway Traffic Safety Administration, United States Department of Transportation, and upon which is printed the brand name.

(2) The container does not bear an accurate statement on the label of the quantity of the contents in terms of liquid measure.

(3) The labeling on the container is false or misleading.

(e) The secretary shall establish the method of sale of diesel exhaust fluid sold at retail to the public. In doing so, the secretary shall adopt, by reference, the latest method of sale for diesel exhaust fluid adopted by the National Council on Weights and Measures and published in the National Institute of Standards and Technology Handbook 130 “Uniform Laws and Regulations in the Areas of Legal Metrology and Fuel Quality,” except as specifically modified, amended, or rejected by regulation adopted by the secretary.

(f) If a container or lot of containers of any commodity subject to this chapter is found to contain a commodity not in conformity with this chapter, the sealer may take one or more samples reasonably
 necessary for enforcement purposes and may, in writing, order the containers off sale. Any lot or container ordered off sale pursuant to this section shall be subject to a disposal order by the enforcing officer and shall not be sold, offered for sale, or transported, except in accordance with that disposal order. Any action pursuant to this section shall not affect any rights of a retailer under a warranty of merchantability or warranty of fitness.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 592, Sec. 32.   (SB 861)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

13712.

A brake fluid receptacle or dispensing device, including “bleeders,” pressurized containers, or any container used to fill a brake system or to expel air from the system after servicing, are exempt from the container labeling requirements in this chapter except for designation of the contents as “DOT____Motor Vehicle Brake Fluid” with the appropriate identification number filled in. The smallest letter and numeral shall not be less than one-eighth inch in height.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 698, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

13713.

Any product referred to in this chapter is adulterated if its characteristics fall below the specifications for that product established by the department as minimum standards.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 13706 by Stats. 1992, Ch. 322, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Container Requirements [13720. - 13720.]

13720.

Each brake fluid container with a capacity of six fluid ounces or more shall be provided with a resealable closure that has an inner seal impervious to the packaged brake fluid. The container closure shall include a tamper-proof feature that will either be destroyed or substantially altered when the container closure is initially opened.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 698, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Enforcement of the Chapter [13730. - 13731.]

13730.

The department and each county sealer shall enforce the provisions of this chapter, and may sample, inspect, analyze, and test any product referred to in this chapter manufactured, packed, stored, sold, or distributed within this state. The department, through its agents, has free access by all legal means during business hours to all premises, buildings, vehicles, cars, and vessels used in the manufacture, packing, storage, sale, or transportation of, and may, by legal means, open any box, carton, parcel, or container of, any product referred to in this chapter and take therefrom samples for analysis or for evidence.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 698, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

13731.
